Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,267
Commission; members; compensation; expenses.

Members shall receive thirty-five dollars per day for each day spent in the performance of their official duties. Members shall receive reimbursement for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1972, LB 1081, § 6;

Laws 1974, LB 506, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 186;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 108.